Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-2509
Poisons; restriction to sale upon medical order; power of Department of Health and Human Services.

The Department of Health and Human Services may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations, whenever such action becomes necessary for the protection of the public, to prohibit the sale of any poison, subject to this section, except upon the original written, oral, or electronic medical order of practitioners credentialed under the Uniform Credentialing Act who are duly authorized by law to administer or professionally use those poisons specifically named in section 71-2501. Whenever in the opinion of the department it is in the interest of the public health, the department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations, not inconsistent with the Poison Control Act, further restricting or prohibiting the retail sale of any poison. The rules and regulations must be applicable to all persons alike. The department shall, upon request by any person authorized by the Poison Control Act to sell or dispense any poisons, furnish such person with a list of all articles, preparations, and compounds the sale of which is prohibited or regulated by the Poison Control Act.

Laws 1941, c. 141, § 14, p. 565;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-933;

R.S.1943, § 81-633;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 628;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 547;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1204;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 85.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.